Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 9. Claim to Recover Property from Administrator

38-13-901.
Claim of another state to recover property.

If the administrator knows that property held by the administrator under this article 13 is subject to a superior claim of another state, the administrator shall:

Report and pay or deliver the property to the other state; or

Return the property to the holder so that the holder may pay or deliver the property to the other state.

The administrator is not required to enter into an agreement to transfer property to the other state under subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 440, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-902.
When property subject to recovery by another state.

Property held by the administrator under this article 13 is subject to the right of another state to take custody of the property if:

The property was paid or delivered to the administrator because the records of the holder did not reflect a last-known address in the other state of the apparent owner and:

The other state establishes that the last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was in the other state; or

Under the law of the other state, the property has become subject to a claim of abandonment by the other state;

The records of the holder did not accurately identify the owner of the property, the last-known address of the owner was in another state, and, under the law of the other state, the property has become subject to a claim of abandonment by the other state;

The property was subject to the custody of the administrator of this state under section 38-13-305 and, under the law of the state of domicile of the holder, the property has become subject to a claim of abandonment by the state of domicile of the holder; or

The property:

Is a sum payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument that was purchased in the other state and delivered to the administrator under section 38-13-306; and

Under the law of the other state, has become subject to a claim of abandonment by the other state.

A claim by another state to recover property under this section must be presented in a form prescribed by the administrator unless the administrator waives presentation of the form.

The administrator shall decide a claim under this section not later than ninety days after it is presented. If the administrator determines that the other state is entitled under subsection (1) of this section to custody of the property, the administrator shall allow the claim and pay or deliver the property to the other state.

The administrator may require another state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its officers and employees against any liability on a claim to the property.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 440, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-902.1.
Claims offset for child support.

Before paying a claim pursuant to section 38-13-905 in an amount exceeding six hundred dollars, the administrator shall offset against the amount of the claim the claimant’s obligations to pay current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support costs, or child support when combined with maintenance. The administrator may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department of human services to implement this section and section 26-13-118.5.

If a claimant owes current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support costs, or child support when combined with maintenance, and also owes restitution or fines, fees, costs, or surcharges as described in section 38-13-902.2, delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest as described in section 38-13-902.3, or both, the unclaimed property offset against the current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support costs, or child support when combined with maintenance takes priority and shall be applied first.

If a claimant owes both restitution or fines, fees, costs, or surcharges and delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest, after payment in accordance with subsection (2)(a) of this section, if applicable, any remaining unclaimed property shall be applied first toward the payment of the outstanding restitution or fines, fees, costs, or surcharges and processed in accordance with section 38-13-902.2 and then applied to the payment of delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest and processed in accordance with section 38-13-902.3.

If a claimant owes restitution or fines, fees, costs, or surcharges or delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest, after payment in accordance with subsection (2)(a) of this section, if applicable, any remaining unclaimed property shall be applied toward the payment of the outstanding restitution or fines, fees, costs, or surcharges and processed in accordance with section 38-13-902.2 or toward the delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest and processed in accordance with section 38-13-902.3, whichever is applicable.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 441, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-902.2.
Claims offset for judicial restitution, fines, fees, costs, or surcharges.

Before paying a claim pursuant to section 38-13-905 in an amount exceeding six hundred dollars, the administrator shall offset against the amount of the claim the claimant’s outstanding court fines, fees, costs, or surcharges or restitution. The administrator may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the judicial department to implement this section and sections 16-11-101.6 (6) and 16-18.5-106.7.

If a claimant owes fines, fees, costs, or surcharges or restitution as described in this section and also owes current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support costs, or child support when combined with maintenance as described in section 38-13-902.1, delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest as described in section 38-13-902.3, or both, the unclaimed property offsets shall be applied in accordance with the priority set forth in section 38-13-902.1 (2).

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 442, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-902.3.
Claims offset for state tax delinquencies.

Before paying a claim pursuant to section 38-13-905 in an amount exceeding six hundred dollars, the administrator shall compare the social security number or federal employer identification number of the claimant with the numbers certified by the department of revenue for the purpose of the unclaimed property offset as provided in section 39-21-121.

If the social security number or federal employer identification number of a claimant appears among the numbers certified by the department of revenue pursuant to section 39-21-121, the administrator shall suspend the payment of the claim until the requirements of section 39-21-121 are met. If, after consulting with the department, the administrator determines that the claimant is obligated to pay the amounts certified under section 39-21-121, the administrator shall withhold from the amount of the unclaimed property paid to the claimant an amount equal to the amount of delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest. If the amount of the unclaimed property is less than or equal to the amount of delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest, the administrator shall withhold the entire amount of the unclaimed property. The administrator shall transmit any unclaimed property so withheld to the department for disbursement as directed in section 39-21-121.

If a claimant owes delinquent state taxes, penalties, or interest as described in this section and also owes current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support costs, or child support when combined with maintenance as described in section 38-13-902.1, restitution or fines, fees, costs, or surcharges as described in section 38-13-902.2, or both, the unclaimed property offset shall be applied in accordance with the priority set forth in section 38-13-902.1 (2).

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 442, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-902.4.
Claim of the state or governmental agency.

At any time after property has been paid or delivered to the administrator under this article 13, if the administrator determines that the state or a state governmental agency owns the property, the administrator may transfer the property to an operating account of the state or the agency.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 443, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-903.
Claim for property by person claiming to be owner.

A person claiming to be the owner of property held by the administrator under this article 13 may file a claim for the property on a form prescribed by the administrator.

The administrator may waive the requirement in subsection (1) of this section and may pay or deliver property directly to a person if:

The person receiving the property or payment is shown to be the apparent owner included on a report filed under section 38-13-401; and

The administrator reasonably believes the person is entitled to receive the property or payment.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 443, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-904.
When administrator must honor claim for property.

The administrator shall pay or deliver property to a claimant under section 38-13-903 if the administrator receives evidence sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the administrator that the claimant is the owner of the property.

Not later than ninety days after a claim is filed under section 38-13-903, the administrator shall allow or deny the claim and give the claimant notice of the decision in a record. If the claim is denied:

The administrator shall inform the claimant of the reason for the denial and specify what additional evidence, if any, is required for the claim to be allowed;

The claimant may file an amended claim with the administrator or commence an action under section 38-13-906; and

The administrator shall consider an amended claim filed under subsection (2)(b) of this section as an initial claim.

If the administrator does not take action on a claim during the ninety-day period following the filing of a claim under section 38-13-903 (1), the claim is deemed denied.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 443, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-905.
Allowance of claim for property.

Not later than thirty days after a claim is allowed under section 38-13-904 (2) or, in the case of a security, not later than forty-five days after the claim is allowed under section 39-13-904 (2), the administrator shall pay or deliver to the owner the property or pay to the owner the net proceeds of a sale of the property, together with income or gain to which the owner is entitled under section 38-13-606.

Before delivery or payment to an owner under subsection (1) of this section of property or payment to the owner of net proceeds of a sale of the property, the administrator first shall apply the property or net proceeds in accordance with sections 38-13-902.2 to 38-13-902.4. The administrator shall pay the amount to the appropriate state agency and notify the owner of the payment.

The administrator may make periodic inquiries of state agencies in the absence of a claim filed under section 38-13-903 to determine whether an apparent owner included in the unclaimed property records of this state has an enforceable debt described in sections 38-13-902.2 to 38-13-902.4. The administrator first shall apply the property or net proceeds of a sale of property held by the administrator to a debt under sections 38-13-902.2 to 38-13-902.4 of an apparent owner that appears in the records of the administrator and deliver the amount to the appropriate state agency. The administrator shall notify the apparent owner of the payment.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 444, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-906.
Action by person whose claim is denied.

Not later than one year after filing a claim with the administrator under section 38-13-903, the claimant may commence an action against the administrator in the district court for the city and county of Denver to establish a claim that has been denied or deemed denied under section 38-13-904. On final determination of the action, the court may, on application, award to the plaintiff their reasonable attorney’s fees, costs, and expenses of litigation.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 444, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.